Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,130
State Board of Education; Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services; agreement; purpose.

The State Board of Education is empowered to enter into an agreement on behalf of the State of Nebraska with the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to carry out the provisions of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, relating to the making of determinations of disability under the provisions of such act.

Laws 1955, c. 324, § 11, p. 1006;

Laws 1973, LB 586, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1455;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 912.